test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_VV_makomii_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - VV - mkomii :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mkomii+NI: mkomii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+mkomii+NI: nmakmii
     2+mkomii+NI: gmakmii
     3+mkomii+NI: makmii
     X+mkomii+NI: makmii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mkomii+NI+Con: mkomiinh
     mkomii+NI+Dim: mkomiins
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mkomii+NI+Pej: mkomiish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mkomii+NI+Prt: mkomiiba
     mkomii+NI+Voc+Pl: mkomiidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mkomii+NI+4: mkomiin
     mkomii+NI+Loc: mkomiing
     mkomii+NI+Pl: mkomiin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+mkomii+NI+Con: nmakmiinh
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim: nmakmiins
     2+mkomii+NI+Con: gmakmiinh
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim: gmakmiins
     3+mkomii+NI+Con: makmiinh
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim: makmiins
     X+mkomii+NI+Con: makmiinh
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim: makmiins
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos: nmakmiim
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos: gmakmiim
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos: makmiim
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos: makmiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej: nmakmiish
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej: gmakmiish
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej: makmiish
     X+mkomii+NI+Pej: makmiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+mkomii+NI+1+Pl: nmakmiinaa
     2+mkomii+NI+1+Pl: gmakmiinaa
     2+mkomii+NI+2+Pl: gmakmiiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+2+Pl: makmiiwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+3+4: makmiini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+Prt: nmakmiiba
     1+mkomii+NI+Voc+Pl: nmakmiidig
     2+mkomii+NI+Prt: gmakmiiba
     2+mkomii+NI+Voc+Pl: gmakmiidig
     3+mkomii+NI+Prt: makmiiba
     3+mkomii+NI+Voc+Pl: makmiidig
     X+mkomii+NI+Prt: makmiiba
     X+mkomii+NI+Voc+Pl: makmiidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+4: nmakmiin
     1+mkomii+NI+Loc: nmakmiing
     1+mkomii+NI+Pl: nmakmiin
     2+mkomii+NI+4: gmakmiin
     2+mkomii+NI+Loc: gmakmiing
     2+mkomii+NI+Pl: gmakmiin
     3+mkomii+NI+4: makmiin
     3+mkomii+NI+Loc: makmiing
     3+mkomii+NI+Pl: makmiin
     X+mkomii+NI+4: makmiin
     X+mkomii+NI+Loc: makmiing
     X+mkomii+NI+Pl: makmiin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mkomii+NI+Con+Pej: mkomiinyish
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej: mkomiinsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mkomii+NI+Con+Prt: mkomiinyba
     mkomii+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: mkomiinydig
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt: mkomiinsba
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: mkomiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mkomii+NI+Con+4: mkomiinyin
     mkomii+NI+Con+Loc: mkomiinying
     mkomii+NI+Con+Pl: mkomiinyin
     mkomii+NI+Dim+4: mkomiinsan
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Loc: mkomiinsing
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Pl: mkomiinsan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mkomii+NI+Pej+Prt: mkomiishba
     mkomii+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: mkomiishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mkomii+NI+Pej+4: mkomiishan
     mkomii+NI+Pej+Loc: mkomiishing
     mkomii+NI+Pej+Pl: mkomiishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mkomii+NI+Prt+4: mkomiibniin
     mkomii+NI+Prt+Loc: mkomiibniing
     mkomii+NI+Prt+Pl: mkomiibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos: nmakmiinyim
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos: nmakmiinsim
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos: gmakmiinyim
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos: gmakmiinsim
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos: makmiinyim
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos: makmiinsim
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos: makmiinyim
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos: makmiinsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej: nmakmiinyish
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej: nmakmiinsish
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej: gmakmiinyish
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej: gmakmiinsish
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej: makmiinyish
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej: makmiinsish
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pej: makmiinyish
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej: makmiinsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl: nmakmiinynaa
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl: nmakmiinsnaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+1+Pl: gmakmiinynaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl: gmakmiinywaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+1+Pl: gmakmiinsnaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl: gmakmiinswaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+2+Pl: makmiinywaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+3+4: makmiinyni
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+2+Pl: makmiinswaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+3+4: makmiinsni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt: nmakmiinyba
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinydig
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt: nmakmiinsba
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinsdig
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt: gmakmiinyba
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinydig
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt: gmakmiinsba
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinsdig
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt: makmiinyba
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: makmiinydig
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt: makmiinsba
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: makmiinsdig
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Prt: makmiinyba
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: makmiinydig
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt: makmiinsba
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: makmiinsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+4: nmakmiinyin
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Loc: nmakmiinying
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+Pl: nmakmiinyin
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+4: nmakmiinsan
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Loc: nmakmiinsing
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pl: nmakmiinsan
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+4: gmakmiinyin
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Loc: gmakmiinying
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+Pl: gmakmiinyin
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+4: gmakmiinsan
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Loc: gmakmiinsing
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pl: gmakmiinsan
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+4: makmiinyin
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Loc: makmiinying
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+Pl: makmiinyin
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+4: makmiinsan
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Loc: makmiinsing
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pl: makmiinsan
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+4: makmiinyin
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Loc: makmiinying
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+Pl: makmiinyin
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+4: makmiinsan
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Loc: makmiinsing
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+Pl: makmiinsan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej: nmakmiimish
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej: gmakmiimish
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej: makmiimish
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pej: makmiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmakmiimnaa
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl: gmakmiimnaa
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: gmakmiimwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl: makmiimwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+3+4: makmiimni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt: nmakmiimba
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: nmakmiimdig
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt: gmakmiimba
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gmakmiimdig
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt: makmiimba
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makmiimdig
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Prt: makmiimba
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: makmiimdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+4: nmakmiiman
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Loc: nmakmiiming
     1+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pl: nmakmiiman
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+4: gmakmiiman
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Loc: gmakmiiming
     2+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pl: gmakmiiman
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+4: makmiiman
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Loc: makmiiming
     3+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pl: makmiiman
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+4: makmiiman
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Loc: makmiiming
     X+mkomii+NI+ThmPos+Pl: makmiiman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl: nmakmiishnaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+1+Pl: gmakmiishnaa
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl: gmakmiishwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+2+Pl: makmiishwaa
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+3+4: makmiishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+Prt: nmakmiishba
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: nmakmiishdig
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+Prt: gmakmiishba
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: gmakmiishdig
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+Prt: makmiishba
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: makmiishdig
     X+mkomii+NI+Pej+Prt: makmiishba
     X+mkomii+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: makmiishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+4: nmakmiishan
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+Loc: nmakmiishing
     1+mkomii+NI+Pej+Pl: nmakmiishan
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+4: gmakmiishan
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+Loc: gmakmiishing
     2+mkomii+NI+Pej+Pl: gmakmiishan
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+4: makmiishan
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+Loc: makmiishing
     3+mkomii+NI+Pej+Pl: makmiishan
     X+mkomii+NI+Pej+4: makmiishan
     X+mkomii+NI+Pej+Loc: makmiishing
     X+mkomii+NI+Pej+Pl: makmiishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+Prt: nmakmiinaanba
     1+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nmakmiinaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+Prt: gmakmiinaanba
     2+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiinaandig
     2+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+Prt: gmakmiiwaaba
     2+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gmakmiiwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+Prt: makmiiwaaba
     3+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: makmiiwaadig
     3+mkomii+NI+3+4+Prt: makmiinwiba
     3+mkomii+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl: makmiinwidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+4: nmakmiinaanin
     1+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+Loc: nmakmiinaaning
     1+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+Pl: nmakmiinaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+4: gmakmiinaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+Loc: gmakmiinaaning
     2+mkomii+NI+1+Pl+Pl: gmakmiinaanin
     2+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+4: gmakmiiwaan
     2+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+Loc: gmakmiiwaang
     2+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+Pl: gmakmiiwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+4: makmiiwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+Loc: makmiiwaang
     3+mkomii+NI+2+Pl+Pl: makmiiwaan
     3+mkomii+NI+3+4+4: makmiinwan
     3+mkomii+NI+3+4+Loc: makmiiniing
     3+mkomii+NI+3+4+Pl: makmiinwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+mkomii+NI+Prt+4: nmakmiibniin
     1+mkomii+NI+Prt+Loc: nmakmiibniing
     1+mkomii+NI+Prt+Pl: nmakmiibniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Prt+4: gmakmiibniin
     2+mkomii+NI+Prt+Loc: gmakmiibniing
     2+mkomii+NI+Prt+Pl: gmakmiibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Prt+4: makmiibniin
     3+mkomii+NI+Prt+Loc: makmiibniing
     3+mkomii+NI+Prt+Pl: makmiibniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Prt+4: makmiibniin
     X+mkomii+NI+Prt+Loc: makmiibniing
     X+mkomii+NI+Prt+Pl: makmiibniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Prt: mkomiinyshiba
     mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: mkomiinyshidig
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt: mkomiinsshiba
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: mkomiinsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+4: mkomiinyshan
     mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: mkomiinyshing
     mkomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pl: mkomiinyshan
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+4: mkomiinsshan
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc: mkomiinsshing
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl: mkomiinsshan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+4: mkomiinybaniin
     mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: mkomiinybaniing
     mkomii+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: mkomiinybaniin
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+4: mkomiinsbaniin
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: mkomiinsbaniing
     mkomii+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: mkomiinsbaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     mkomii+NI+Pej+Prt+4: mkomiishbaniin
     mkomii+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: mkomiishbaniing
     mkomii+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: mkomiishbaniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: nmakmiinymish
     1+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: nmakmiinsmish
     2+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gmakmiinymish
     2+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gmakmiinsmish
     3+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: makmiinymish
     3+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: makmiinsmish
     X+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej: makmiinymish
     X+mkomii+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: makmiinsmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+mkomii+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: nmakmiinyminaa
